Utah statutes.
16-10a-907.   Indemnification of officers, employees, fiduciaries, and agents.

Unless a corporation's articles of incorporation provide otherwise:

(1)  an officer of the corporation is entitled to mandatory indemnification under Section 16-10a-903, and is entitled to apply for court-ordered indemnification under Section 16-10a-905, in each case to the same extent as a director;

(2)  the corporation may indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent of the corporation to the same extent as to a director; and

(3)  a corporation may also indemnify and advance expenses to an officer, employee, fiduciary, or agent who is not a director to a greater extent, if not inconsistent with public policy, and if provided for by its articles of incorporation, bylaws, general or specific action of its board of directors, or contract.

